Wisconsin, session 2025, AB233.
do enact as follows:AB233,11Section 1. 165.96 (intro.), (2), (4), (5), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) and (13) of the 2statutes are amended to read:AB233,2,83165.96 Child advocacy grants. (intro.) Beginning in fiscal year 2011-2012, 4from From the appropriation under s. 20.455 (5) (ke), the department of justice 5shall in each fiscal year provide $17,000 to award grants to each of the following 6child advocacy centers for education, training, medical advice, and quality 7assurance activities to enhance the multidisciplinary response to suspected child 8maltreatment:AB233,2,99(2) Child Protection Milwaukee Child Advocacy Center in Milwaukee County.AB233,2,1010(4) Kenosha County Child Advocacy Center in Kenosha County.AB233,2,1111(5) Fox Valley Child Advocacy Center in Winnebago Outagamie County.AB233,2,1312(8) Child Advocacy Center of Northeastern North Central Wisconsin in 13Marathon County.AB233,2,1514(9) Chippewa County Valley Child Advocacy Center in Chippewa Eau Claire 15County.AB233,2,1716(10) A child advocacy center Willow Tree Cornerstone Child Advocacy Center 17in Brown County.AB233,2,1918(11) A child advocacy center Racine County Child Advocacy Center in Racine 19County.AB233,2,2120(12) A child advocacy center Walworth County Child Advocacy Center in 21Walworth County.AB233,2,2222(13) CHAT Room Green County Child Advocacy Center in Green County.AB233,223Section 2. 165.96 (16) and (17) of the statutes are created to read:AB233,3,11165.96 (16) Lakeshore Regional Child Advocacy Center in Sheboygan County.AB233,3,22(17) Child Advocacy Centers of Wisconsin.AB233,3,33